Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.150

Report to department of enterprise services.

Every month a copy of the United States department of commerce, bureau of the census' "report of building or zoning permits issued and local public construction" or equivalent report shall be transmitted by the governing bodies of counties and cities to the department of enterprise services.

[ 2015 c 225 s 18; 2010 c 271 s 303; 1995 c 399 s 10; 1989 c 246 s 6.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2010 c 271: See notes following RCW 43.330.005.